Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.075

Essential academic learning requirements and grade level expectations for educational technology literacy and technology fluency—Assessments—Reports.

(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, by December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop essential academic learning requirements and grade level expectations for educational technology literacy and technology fluency that identify the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to know and be able to do in the areas of technology and technology literacy. The development process shall include a review of current standards that have been developed or are used by other states and national and international technology associations. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the technology essential academic learning requirements.

(a) As used in this section, "technology literacy" means the ability to responsibly, creatively, and effectively use appropriate technology to communicate; access, collect, manage, integrate, and evaluate information; solve problems and create solutions; build and share knowledge; and improve and enhance learning in all subject areas and experiences.

(b) Technology fluency builds upon technology literacy and is demonstrated when students: Apply technology to real-world experiences; adapt to changing technologies; modify current and create new technologies; and personalize technology to meet personal needs, interests, and learning styles.

(2)(a) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, the superintendent shall obtain or develop education technology assessments that may be administered in the elementary, middle, and high school grades to assess the essential academic learning requirements for technology. The assessments shall be designed to be classroom or project-based so that they can be embedded in classroom instruction and be administered and scored by school staff throughout the regular school year using consistent scoring criteria and procedures. By the 2010-11 school year, these assessments shall be made available to school districts for the districts' voluntary use. If a school district uses the assessments created under this section, then the school district shall notify the superintendent of public instruction of the use. The superintendent shall report annually to the legislature on the number of school districts that use the assessments each school year.

(b) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the relevant legislative committees regarding the use of the assessments.

[ 2007 c 396 s 16; (2009 c 556 s 15 expired July 1, 2011).]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2009 c 556 ss 11, 13, and 15: See note following RCW 28A.300.525.

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.

Essential academic learning requirements and grade level expectations—Revised standards and curricula for mathematics and science—Duties of the state board of education and the superintendent of public instruction: RCW 28A.305.215.